Utah statutes.
20A-9-204.   Inducements not to become candidate.

(1) (a)  It is unlawful for any person to pay or reward, or promise to pay or reward, another in any manner or form for the purpose of inducing that other person to be, or to refrain from or cease being, a candidate.

(b)  It is unlawful for any person to solicit any payment, promise, or reward from another for the purpose of inducing that other person to be, or to refrain from or cease being, a candidate.

(2)  Any person who violates this section is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.



Enacted by Chapter 1, 1994 General Session

